District of Columbia statutes.
28-4007

Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any provision, sentence, clause, section or part is held illegal, invalid, unconstitutional or inapplicable to any person or circumstances, such holding shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions, sentences, clauses, sections, or parts of this chapter or its application to other persons or circumstances. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been adopted if such illegal, invalid, inapplicable, or unconstitutional provision, sentence, clause, section, or part had not been included herein and if the person or circumstances to which the chapter or any part is inapplicable had been specifically exempted.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-33, § 8, 24 DCR 3726
enacted, Sept. 6, 1980, D.C. Law 3-85, § 3(b), (e), 27 DCR 2900

History

1981 Ed., § 28-4007.
1973 Ed., T. 28, Appx., § 58.

Prior Codifications